California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The district is entitled to the benefit of any reservation or grant, in all cases, where any right has been reserved or granted to any public agency to construct or maintain roads, highways, or other crossings over any public or private lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transit Planning [103260. - 103265.]

103260.

The board shall adopt a general transit plan for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103261.

The general transit plan, or any element or amendment thereof, shall be adopted in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103262.

The general manager shall submit the proposed plan, or an element or amendment thereof, to the board which shall hold a public hearing thereon. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 30 days before the hearing. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, and written notice shall also be mailed to each city council in the county. The hearing may be continued from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103263.

The adoption of the general plan, or an element or amendment thereof, including any changes or additions, shall be by resolution of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103264.

The district may adopt official plan lines based on the adopted general plan designating the precise location of planned rights-of-way of transit works and facilities. Official plan lines shall be adopted in the same manner as required for the adoption of the general plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103265.

The provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 53090), Chapter 1, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code shall not be applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [103280. - 103290.]

103280.

The district may provide transit service within or without the district for the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage and parcels by any means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103281.

The district may operate charter bus service subject to the following limitations:

(a) No bus equipment which is designed solely for charter service shall be purchased. A bus equipped with a toilet or underfloor baggage compartment shall be deemed charter equipment.

(b) The board shall hold a public hearing prior to adopting a charter rate schedule or any amendment thereof. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to each charter-party carrier operating within the district at least 30 days prior to the hearing. The notice shall include the
 proposed charter rate schedule. At the close of the public hearing, the board may adopt charter rate schedules which shall not be less than the average for the three largest private charter-party carriers operating similar service in the district.

(c) Charter service shall originate and terminate within the area served by the district unless a private charter-party carrier requests the district to provide service beyond the area served by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103282.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, parking lots, and any and all facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or without the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons or vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in, or rights to, the use or joint use of any or all of the foregoing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103283.

The district may lease, or contract for the use of, its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator,” as used in this section, means any public agency or any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103284.

The board may contract with any public agency or person to provide transit facilities and services for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103285.

The district may construct and operate, or acquire and operate, transit works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any state or public highway, or any stream, bay, or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103286.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any public agency or public utility operating transit facilities and may enter into agreements with any public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, wholly or partially within or without the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers, or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103287.

The rates and charges, if any, for transit service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103288.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to the operation of buses and to the rules and regulations enforceable by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103289.

The district and any one or more school districts located within the district may enter into agreements pursuant to which school transportation equipment may be used for transit purposes within the district during any time that such equipment is not actually required for school purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103290.

No interconnection shall be made into fixed right-of-way facilities of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District without the approval of the voters of the district at an election called for the purpose of securing such approval. Any fixed right-of-way facilities shall be in compliance with Section 66515.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Existing Systems and Services [103300. - 103303.]

103300.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, before the district may establish any transit service or system which may significantly divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of any existing system, other than an existing taxi service, the district shall give a written notice to the public utility or public agency which is operating the existing system. The written notice shall describe the transit service or system which the district proposes to establish and shall state the time within which the district proposes to establish such service or system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

103301.

Where notice is required pursuant to Section 103300, the district shall not establish the proposed service or system, or maintain and operate the service or system, until it has completed the purchase of any existing system or any part thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

103301.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, before the district may establish any demand-activated service or system which may, at any time, divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of any existing taxi service, the district shall give a written notice to that service. The written notice shall describe the demand-activated service or system which the district proposes to establish and shall state the time within which the district proposes to establish such service or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

103301.6.

If any demand-activated service or system operated by the district diverts or lessens the patronage or revenues of any existing taxi service by causing a loss of patronage or revenues in the affected service area of any existing taxi service to the extent of 10 percent or more, the district shall not continue its demand-activated service or system, or maintain and operate the service or system, until it has completed the purchase of any existing taxi service or any part thereof. No purchase of an existing taxi service, or part thereof, need be made by the district as a result of the establishment or operation by the district of any service or system other than a
 demand-activated service or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

103302.

The district and entity operating the existing system or the existing taxi service may agree upon the purchase price or they may agree that the purchase price is to be established by arbitration and upon the method of naming arbitrators and the method of conducting such arbitration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

103303.

Section 851 shall not apply to any contract for sale or sale of an existing system or existing taxi service, or any portion thereof, pursuant to this chapter, and the Public Utilities Commission shall have no jurisdiction with respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Public Grants, Loans, and Contributions [103310. - 103311.]

103310.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions, grants, or loans from any public agency or the United States or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, any public agency or the United States, or agency thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of any such transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of
 California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103311.

The district shall have the power to obtain temporary transfers of funds in accordance with the last paragraph of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 166.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Property Taxation [103320. - 103333.]

103320.

The district may levy and collect, or cause to be collected, property taxes for any lawful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103321.

In addition to revenues and receipts from other sources, the board may levy and collect a property tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103322.

The district shall not levy or collect a property tax unless a majority of the voters voting on the question at an election called for such purpose approves the levy of a property tax by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103323.

Each election shall be called and conducted by the district in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of special elections by a county. The board may contract with the county, or delegate to the appropriate county officials the authority, to conduct the election on behalf of the district. The costs of any such election may be advanced to the district by the county prior to the time that the district has revenues of its own, to be repaid from subsequent district revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103324.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto, the following:Shall the San Mateo County Transit District be authorized to operate and levy a property tax at an annual rate which shall not exceed ______ cents ($0.___) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation within the
 district?YES◻NO ◻

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103326.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the county assessor and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county, and shall take such assessments as the basis for district property taxation and have its property taxes collected by the county tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 180.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

103327.

The county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103328.

The board shall, on or before the first day of September, fix the rate or rates of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100), and use as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103329.

The board shall, immediately after fixing the rate or rates of taxes, transmit to the county auditor a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103330.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103331.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103332.

All taxes levied under this article are a lien on the property on which they are levied. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this article so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103333.

In lieu of, or in addition to, any taxes which may be levied by the district pursuant to this article, any city council within the district or the board of supervisors may enter into agreement with the district to make annual contributions to the district from its general funds or from any other source of funds legally available to it for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Taxation for Bond Redemption Purposes [103340. - 103348.]

103340.

The district may levy and collect, or cause to be collected, property taxes, for bond redemption purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103341.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if from any cause the revenues of the district are, or are expected to be, inadequate in any year to pay the principal of, interest on, or sinking fund payments for bonds of the district as they become due, or to establish or maintain any reserve fund therefor, the board shall levy for district purposes and collect upon all property in the district taxable for county purposes a tax sufficient, together with revenues already collected and available therefor, to pay the interest on the bonds as they will become due and such part of the principal thereof, including any sinking fund installments
 required by any of the district’s agreements with its bondholders, that will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available for such purpose, and sufficient to provide or to restore such reserve fund to the amount required by any of the district’s agreements with its bondholders.

(b) If the ordinance calling the election on the issuance of bonds provides that all or any portion of the retail transaction and use tax authorized under Article 10 (commencing with Section 103350) be levied and used to the extent required to pay principal of and interest on the bonds, the board, in order to provide for any sinking fund payments required therefor and to create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor, shall estimate the revenues of the district which are expected to be available for such purposes and the amount to be raised by such a tax as is required to be levied and used for such purposes in
 order to provide for the payment of all such obligations when due. The board may, in its regular annual budget, or in a special budget which may be prepared at any time, show the amounts needed for such purposes, estimate the revenue available therefor, and thereafter fix the rates of and levy and collect, or provide for the collection of, such a tax as will provide, together with other revenues available therefor, at least all sums necessary for such purposes insofar as such levies do not exceed the maximum rates of such a tax stated in the ordinance calling the bond election.

If from any cause the revenues of the district are, or are expected to be, inadequate to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds and sinking fund payments as they become due, and establish or maintain any reserve fund required therefor, and if the proceeds of such tax levied at the maximum rates authorized, together with such revenues, are still estimated to be insufficient for such
 purposes, the board shall levy and collect upon all property in the district taxable for county purposes a tax at least sufficient, with the revenues already collected and available therefor, together with the anticipated proceeds of the special tax, to pay the interest on the bonds that will become due and such part of the principal thereof, including any sinking fund payments, that will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the time of the next general tax levy will be available for such purposes, and sufficient to provide or to restore such reserve fund to the amount required by any of the district’s agreements with its bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103342.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of the county and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county, and shall take such assessments as the basis for district property taxation and have its property taxes collected by the tax collector of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103343.

The county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 103326.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103344.

The board shall, on or before the first day of September, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100), and use as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103345.

The board shall, immediately after fixing the rate of taxes, transmit to the county controller a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103346.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103347.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county controller pursuant to provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103348.

All taxes levied under this article are a lien on the property on which they are levied. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this article so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Retail Transaction and Use Tax [103350. - 103363.]

103350.

(a) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance may be adopted by the board in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and consistent with Article XIII   C of the California Constitution.

(b) The board may impose a retail transactions and use tax pursuant to subdivision (a) that, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, exceeds the limit established in Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if both of the following requirements are met: 

(1) The tax is set at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent.

(2) The board adopts the ordinance approving the tax before January 1, 2026.

(c) For purposes of a new tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (b), the board, in concurrence with the County of San Mateo, shall develop an expenditure plan of projects, programs, and services that may include, among other things, public transit, local streets and roads, state highways, bicycle
 and pedestrian facilities, intelligent transportation systems, and transportation planning.

(d) The board may administer the expenditure plan in its entirety, or may transfer proceeds of the tax to the San Mateo County Transportation Authority for administration by that authority consistent with the expenditure plan.

(e) The board shall not act pursuant to subdivision (b) if a transactions and use tax has been imposed pursuant to Section 7295 of the
 Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 231, Sec. 1.   (AB 1613)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

103351.

Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing not less than 180 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103352.

The district may contract with the State Board of Equalization for its services in the preparation necessary to administer a transaction and use tax ordinance. The costs to be covered by the contract are to be for services of the types described in Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for preparatory work up to the date of the adoption of the ordinance. Any disputes as to the amount of the costs shall be resolved in the same manner as provided in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

103353.

Prior to the operative date of the transaction and use tax ordinance, the district shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103354.

If the district shall not have contracted with the State Board of Equalization prior to the operative date of its transaction and use tax ordinance, it shall nevertheless so contract, and, in such case, the operative date shall be the first day of the first calendar quarter following the execution of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103355.

Repeal of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be operative earlier than the first day of the first calendar quarter following the adoption of the ordinance of repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103356.

Whenever a bond election is held to authorize a bonded indebtedness pursuant to Section 103500, the ordinance calling the election may include a statement that the transaction and use taxes, or a stated portion thereof, shall be levied, or continued to be levied, and used to the extent required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as they become due, to provide any sinking fund payments required therefor, and to create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor.

A vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds shall authorize the use of such taxes for such purposes. The transactions and use tax ordinance shall not
 be repealed until all bonds payable from the revenues derived from such taxes have been fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103357.

(a) The district may issue bonds payable from the proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness which may be outstanding at any one time shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, but not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the transactions and use tax , as determined by the district. The amount of bonds outstanding at any one time does not include the amount of any bonds or refunding bonds for which moneys or securities necessary to provide for the payment thereof have been set aside
 for that purpose in a trust or escrow account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1120, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

103358.

(a) The bonds may be issued by the district at any time, and from time to time, payable from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.” The bonds may be secured by a pledge of revenues from the proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax or any other funds or assets of the district as may be specified by the district.

(b) The pledge of retail transactions and use taxes to the limited tax bonds authorized under this article shall have priority over the use of any of the taxes for “pay-as-you-go”
 financing, except to the extent that the priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(c) A pledge by or to the district of tax receipts, revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind made by or to the district shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made for the benefit of pledgees and successors thereto. The tax receipts, revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind pledged by or to the district or the assignees shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act. The lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties, regardless of whether the parties have notice of the claim. The indenture, trust agreement, resolution, or another instrument by which the pledge is created need not be
 recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1328, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

103359.

The district may provide for the bonds to bear a variable interest rate, for the manner and intervals in which the rate shall vary, and for the dates on which the interest shall be payable. In connection with the issuance of bonds, the district may enter into any agreement for liquidity or credit enhancement that may be necessary or desirable, as determined by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1328, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

103360.

(a) Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time, and from time to time, by the district by a two-thirds vote of all members of the board of the district.

(b) The district may, from time to time, issue bonds in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), for the purposes set forth in Section 103282, which shall constitute an “enterprise” within the meaning of Section 54309 of the Government Code, and the
 proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax shall constitute “revenues” within the meaning of Section 54315 of the Government Code. Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the limitations set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 54402 and in Sections 54403 and 54418 of the Government Code do not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this article. Instead, the district shall authorize the issuance of bonds by resolution, which resolution shall specify all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the bonds are to be issued, which may be general. 

(2) The maximum principal amount of the bonds.

(3) The maximum term for the bonds.

(4) The maximum rate of
 interest to be payable upon the bonds, which shall not exceed the maximum rate permitted for bonds of the district by Section 53531 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law. In the case of bonds bearing a variable interest rate, the variable rate shall on no day exceed the maximum rate permitted for bonds of the district on that day by Section 53531 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law. However, the variable interest rate so permitted may on any day exceed that maximum rate if the interest paid on the bonds from their date of original issuance on that day does not exceed the total interest which would have been permitted to have been paid on the bonds if the bonds had borne interest at all times from the date of issuance to that day at the maximum rate permitted from time to time by Section 53531 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law.

(5) The maximum discount or
 premium on the sale of bonds. The bonds may be sold at less or more than the principal amount thereof in the manner and to the extent determined by the district.

(c) For purposes of the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this article, the following definitions are applicable to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941:

(1) “Resolution” means, unless the context otherwise requires, the instrument providing the terms and conditions for the issuance of the limited tax bonds, and may be an indenture, resolution, ordinance, order, agreement, or other instrument in writing.

(2) “Fiscal agent” means any fiscal agent, trustee, paying agent, depository, or other fiduciary provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, which fiscal agent may be located within or without the state.

(d) Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of the bonds authorized has been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series with different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1328, Sec. 6.   Effective September 29, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

103360.1.

(a) The district may issue refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the district upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either of the following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale
 thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this article for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1120, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

103360.2.

(a) The district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this article but which have not been sold or delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. However, the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any money of the
 district available therefor, including the revenues from the retail transactions and use tax. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thererof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the district in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of the bonds which the district has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The bond anticipation notes and the resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of
 the district may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1120, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

103361.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this article are legal instruments for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds. Whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, those funds may be invested in the bonds issued pursuant to this article, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state, may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act
 or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued pursuant to this article may be so used. The provisions of this article are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investment and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1328, Sec. 7.   Effective September 29, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

103362.

This article provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for doing what is authorized by this article and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to the powers conferred by any other laws. The issuance of bonds and the entering into any credit reimbursement or other agreement under this article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the district or the issuance of bonds or the incurring of indebtedness. Bonds issued by the district prior to the effective date of the act which enacted this section which were subject to investigation, reports, and approval or certification by
 the Treasurer pursuant to the District Securities Investigation Law of 1965 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 58750) of Division 2 of Title 6 of the Government Code), and the Districts Securities Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 10 of the Water Code) prior to the adoption of this article shall continue to be subject to those investigations, reports, and approvals or certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1328, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

103363.
